Idaho, session 2025, H0014.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Title 67, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby amended
by the addition thereto of a NEW CHAPTER, to be known and designated as Chap-
ter 37, Title 67, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
CHAPTER 37
IDAHO CODE CLEANUP ACT
67-3701. SHORT TITLE. This act shall be known and may be cited as the
"Idaho Code Cleanup Act."
67-3702. DECLARATION OF NECESSITY. It is the intent of the legisla-
ture to ensure that the state laws provided in Idaho Code are streamlined,
up-to-date, and essential for the citizens of Idaho, while best serving the
public health, safety, and welfare. To this end, the legislature recognizes
the need for a comprehensive effort to review the Idaho Code for the purpose
of eliminating bureaucracy. Accordingly, in the interest of addressing the
accumulation of unnecessary provisions, the purpose of this chapter is to
establish an efficient process for the identification of provisions that are
obsolete, outdated, or unnecessary so that such provisions may be considered
for removal.
67-3703. DEFINITIONS. For the purposes of this chapter:
(1) "Obsolete" means expired, unused, void, unenforceable, or not en-
forced.
(2) "Outdated" means no longer applicable or pertinent, duplicative
with other portions of code, or superseded by other laws.
(3) "State agency" means each department, commission, board, council,
agency, institution, division, office, committee, authority, or other ad-
ministrative unit of the state.
(4) "Unnecessary" means that public health, safety, and welfare is not
served by the portion of code.
67-3704. REVIEW OF IDAHO CODE -- REPORT. (1) On or before September 1,
2025, all state agencies shall:
(a) Review their enabling statutes, associated code sections, and any
code sections that they enforce; and


(b) Report to the legislature for consideration any code chapters, sec-
tions, or subsections that are deemed by the agency to be obsolete, out-
dated, or unnecessary. The report shall include, for each chapter, sec-
tion, or subsection identified, a concise notation as to why such por-
tion of code is deemed by the state agency to be obsolete, outdated, or
unnecessary and whether it should be repealed or otherwise removed from
Idaho Code.
(2) The report required pursuant to this section shall be delivered to
the Idaho legislative services office through an online web portal to be es-
tablished for this purpose.
(3) In addition to the requirements of this section, an agency may in-
clude in its report:
(a) Information regarding additional code chapters, sections, or sub-
sections that are not within its purview but that are identified by such
agency as obsolete, outdated, or unnecessary; and
(b) Information regarding code chapters, sections, or subsections that
remain necessary for the public health, safety, and welfare but that
could be made more concise through legislative action.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval.